Utah statutes.
3-1-29.   Inconsistent acts repealed -- Existing associations continued.

All acts and parts of acts which are inconsistent with the provisions of this act are repealed. It is intended by the enactment of this measure to continue in good standing all existing associations organized under similar acts heretofore existing, and in no way to detract from or interfere with the continued operations of such associations, and it is intended that this act shall supersede Title 2, Revised Statutes of Utah, 1933, in the interest of the further aid, encouragement, strengthening, and stabilizing of all such associations.



No Change Since 1953

